Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.330

Reassessments—Payment.

In case of reassessment after the certification of the assessment roll to the city or town treasurer for collection, the same length of time for payment of the assessment thereon without the imposition of any penalties or interest and the notice that the assessments are in the hands of the treasurer for collection shall be given as in case of an original assessment. After delinquency, penalties and interest may be charged as in cases of original assessment and if the original assessment was payable in installments, the new assessment may be divided into equal installments and made payable at such times as the city or town council may prescribe in the ordinance ordering the new assessment.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.330. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 43, part; 1909 c 71 s 1, part; 1893 c 95 s 2, part; RRS s 9396, part.]